Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8005
Interest; rate; payment.

(1) An insurer that fails to pay, deny, or settle a clean claim in accordance with the time periods set forth in subsection (1) of section 44-8004 or to take other required action within the time periods set forth in subsection (2) of section 44-8004 shall pay interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum on the total amount ultimately allowed on the claim, accruing from the date payment was due pursuant to section 44-8004.

(2) To the extent that interest is not paid concurrently with the claim, it may be paid on a quarterly basis or when the aggregate interest for a health care provider exceeds ten dollars.

Laws 2005, LB 389, § 5.